Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-110
Game and Parks Commission; commissioners, officers, and employees; bond or insurance.

Each member of the Game and Parks Commission, all conservation officers, managers and custodians of parks, hatcheries, and captive wildlife facilities, all other agents, and all employees thereof, shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201.

Laws 1929, c. 113, § 14, p. 447;

C.S.1929, § 81-6514;

Laws 1935, c. 174, § 11, p. 644;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-6514;

R.S.1943, § 81-811;

Laws 1967, c. 585, § 12, p. 1980;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 32;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-811;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 18.